Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.220

Statute tolled—As to person in military service of United States.

When the enforcement of civil liabilities against a person in the military service of the United States has been suspended by operation of law, the period of such suspension shall not be a part of the period limited for the commencement of the action.

[1941 c 174 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 39; 1854 p 365 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 171, part.]

NOTES:

Application of federal law: RCW 73.16.070.